Montana, session 2025, HB389.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Required setback for wind turbine generators. After [the effective date
of this act], a wind turbine generator built pursuant to a wind energy agreement as described in 70-17-406 may
not be constructed if the base of the tower is located at a distance less than:
(1) 1,250 feet from the property line of any real property subject to a wind energy agreement as
described in 70-17-406 with the owner of the wind turbine generator;
(2) 3,000 feet from public roads and highways of this state as defined in 15-70-401;
(3) 7,920 feet from the property line of any real property not subject to a wind energy agreement
as described in 70-17-406 with the owner of the wind turbine generator.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as a new
part in Title 75, chapter 26, and the provisions of Title 75, chapter 26, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 389